Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska8-148.03
Bonds of the State of Israel; securities; banks; savings and loan associations, insurance companies, credit unions; invest funds.

Bonds of the State of Israel are hereby made securities in which banks, savings and loan associations, insurance companies, and credit unions may properly and legally invest funds.

Laws 1974, LB 845, § 3.